Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1826
Real property taxes; redemption from sale; minors; time permitted.

The real property of minors, or any interest they may have in any real property sold for taxes, may be redeemed at any time during the time of redemption above described or at any time before such minor becomes of age and during two years thereafter.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 212, p. 466;

Laws 1905, c. 114, § 1, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 6540;

C.S.1922, § 6068;

Laws 1923, c. 105, § 1, p. 261;

Laws 1925, c. 168, § 1, p. 441;

C.S.1929, § 77-2020;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 8, p. 520;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 28, p. 658;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 28, p. 445;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 28, p. 629;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2020;

R.S.1943, § 77-1826;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 153;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 126.